Nevada, session 83, SB195.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 293 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. 1. The Secretary of State and each county clerk
shall establish procedures to inform registered voters of the
requirements for voting by mail ballot, including, without
limitation:
-
*SB195*

– 3 –
(a) The deadline for returning a mail ballot by mail or
personal delivery; and
(b) The deadline and process for a registered voter to cure any
defect with the voter’s signature on the mail ballot pursuant to
NRS 293.269927.
 The procedures established pursuant to this subsection must
not conflict with the provisions of this section and NRS
293.269911 to 293.269937, inclusive, and section 3 of this act.
2. Each county clerk shall provide training to election board
officers and employees of the elections division of the county on
the requirements for processing and counting mail ballots,
including, without limitation, the process for allowing a registered
voter to cure any defect with the registered voter’s signature on the
mail ballot.
Sec. 3. 1. After each election, the county clerk shall submit
a report to the Secretary of State regarding mail ballots that
includes, without limitation:
(a) The number of mail ballots that were sent to registered
voters;
(b) The number of mail ballots that were returned by
registered voters;
(c) The number of mail ballots that were returned to the
county clerk by mail or personal delivery;
(d) The number of mail ballots that were returned without the
signature of the registered voter or that contained a defect in the
signature;
(e) The number of registered voters who were contacted by the
county clerk to cure a missing or defective signature; and
(f) The total number of mail ballots that were counted in the
election.
2. The Secretary of State shall compile the information
received pursuant to subsection 1 from each county clerk and
submit a summary to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for transmittal to the Legislature or, if the Legislature is
not in session, to the Legislative Commission.
Sec. 4. NRS 293.269915 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293.269915 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
if a person applied by mail or computer to register to vote, or
preregistered to vote by mail or computer and is subsequently
deemed to be registered to vote, and the person has not previously
voted in any election for federal office in this State, the county clerk
must inform the person that he or she must include a copy of the
information required in paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS
293.2725 in the return envelope with the mail ballot.
-
*SB195*

– 4 –
2. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to a person who:
(a) Registers to vote by mail or computer, or preregisters to vote
by mail or computer and is subsequently deemed to be registered to
vote, and submits with his or her application to preregister or
register to vote:
(1) A copy of a current and valid photo identification; or
(2) A copy of a current utility bill, bank statement, paycheck
or document issued by a governmental entity, including a check
which indicates the name and address of the person, but not
including a voter registration card;
(b) Registers to vote by mail or computer and submits with his
or her application to register to vote a driver’s license number or at
least the last four digits of his or her social security number, if a
state or local election official has matched that information with an
existing identification record bearing the same number, name and
date of birth as provided by the person in the application;
(c) Registers to vote pursuant to NRS 293.5768 to 293.57699,
inclusive, and at that time presents to the automatic voter
registration agency:
(1) A copy of a current and valid photo identification;
(2) A copy of a current utility bill, bank statement, paycheck
or document issued by a governmental entity, including a check
which indicates the name and address of the person, but not
including a voter registration card; or
(3) A driver’s license number or at least the last four digits of
his or her social security number, if a state or local election official
has matched that information with an existing identification record
bearing the same number, name and date of birth as provided by the
person in the application;
(d) Is entitled to vote pursuant to the provisions of chapter 293D
of NRS or the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting
Act, 52 U.S.C. §§ 20301 et seq.;
(e) Is provided the right to vote otherwise than in person
pursuant to the provisions of the Voting Accessibility for the Elderly
and Handicapped Act, 52 U.S.C. §§ 20101 et seq.; or
(f) Is entitled to vote otherwise than in person pursuant to the
provisions of any other federal law.
3. If a person fails to provide the identification required
pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS 293.2725 with his
or her mail ballot:
(a) The mail ballot must be treated as a provisional ballot; and
(b) The county clerk must:
(1) Contact the person;
(2) Allow the person to provide the identification required
before 5 p.m. on the [sixth] third day following the election; and
-
*SB195*

– 5 –
(3) If the identification required pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subsection 1 of NRS 293.2725 is provided, ensure the mail ballot is
delivered to the appropriate mail ballot central counting board.
Sec. 5. NRS 293.269921 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293.269921 1. Except as otherwise provided in [subsection 2
and] chapter 293D of NRS, in order for a mail ballot to be counted
for any election, before the close of business of the office of the
county clerk on the day of the election, the mail ballot must be:
(a) [Before the time set for closing of the polls, delivered]
Delivered by hand to the county clerk [,] or any ballot drop box
established in the county pursuant to this section; or
(b) [Mailed to] Received by mail by the county clerk . [, and:
(1) Postmarked on or before the day of the election; and
(2) Received by the clerk not later than 5 p.m. on the fourth
day following the election.]
2. [If a mail ballot is received by mail not later than 5 p.m. on
the third day following the election and the date of the postmark
cannot be determined, the mail ballot shall be deemed to have been
postmarked on or before the day of the election.
3.] Each county clerk must establish a ballot drop box at every
polling place in the county, including, without limitation, a polling
place for early voting. A county clerk may establish a ballot drop
box at any other location in the county where mail ballots can be
delivered by hand and collected during the period for early voting
and on election day. No person other than a clerk may establish a
drop box for mail ballots.
[4.] 3. A ballot drop box must be:
(a) Constructed of metal or any other rigid material of sufficient
strength and resistance to protect the security of the mail ballots; and
(b) Capable of securely receiving and holding the mail ballots
and being locked.
[5.] 4. A ballot drop box must be:
(a) Placed in an accessible and convenient location at the office
of the county clerk or a polling place in the county; and
(b) Made available for use during the hours when the office of
the county clerk, or the polling place, is open for business or voting,
as applicable [.] , except that on election day, the ballot drop box
must not be available after the close of business of the office of the
county clerk.
Sec. 6. NRS 293.269923 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293.269923 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
at the request of a voter whose mail ballot has been prepared by or
on behalf of the voter, a person authorized by the voter may return
-
*SB195*

– 6 –
the mail ballot on behalf of the voter by mail or personal delivery to
the county clerk, or any ballot drop box established in the county,
pursuant to NRS 293.269921.
2. Except for an election board officer in the course of the
election board officer’s official duties, a person shall not willfully:
(a) Impede, obstruct, prevent or interfere with the return of a
voter’s mail ballot;
(b) Deny a voter the right to return the voter’s mail ballot; or
(c) If the person receives the voter’s mail ballot and
authorization to return the mail ballot on behalf of the voter by mail
or personal delivery, fail to return the mail ballot [, unless otherwise
authorized by the voter,] by mail or personal delivery [:
(1) Before the end of the third day after the day of receipt, if
the person receives the mail ballot from the voter four or more days
before the day of the election; or
(2) Before the deadline established by the United States
Postal Service for the mail ballot to be postmarked on the day of the
election or before the polls close on the day of the election, as
applicable to the type of delivery, if the person receives the mail
ballot from the voter three or fewer days before the day of the
election.] so that the mail ballot is received by the county clerk
before the close of business of the office of the county clerk on the
day of the election.
3. A person who violates any provision of subsection 2 is
guilty of a category E felony and shall be punished as provided in
NRS 193.130.
Sec. 7. NRS 293.269925 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293.269925 1. The county clerk shall establish procedures
for the fair and efficient processing and counting of mail ballots.
2. The procedures established pursuant to subsection 1:
(a) May authorize mail ballots to be processed, verified and
counted by computer or other electronic means; and
(b) Must not conflict with the provisions of NRS 293.269911 to
293.269937, inclusive.
Sec. 8. NRS 293.269927 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293.269927 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS
293D.200, when a mail ballot is returned by or on behalf of a voter
to the county clerk, and a record of its return is made in the mail
ballot record for the election, the clerk or an employee in the office
of the clerk shall check the signature used for the mail ballot by
electronic means pursuant to subsection 2 or manually pursuant to
subsection 3.
-
*SB195*

– 7 –
2. To check the signature used for a mail ballot by electronic
means:
(a) The electronic device must take a digital image of the
signature used for the mail ballot and compare the digital image
with the signatures of the voter from his or her application to
register to vote or application to preregister to vote available in the
records of the county clerk.
(b) If the electronic device does not match the signature of the
voter, the signature shall be reviewed manually pursuant to the
provisions of subsection 3.
3. To check the signature used for a mail ballot manually, the
county clerk shall use the following procedure:
(a) The clerk or employee shall check the signature used for the
mail ballot against all signatures of the voter available in the records
of the clerk.
(b) If at least two employees in the office of the clerk believe
there is a reasonable question of fact as to whether the signature
used for the mail ballot matches the signature of the voter, the clerk
shall contact the voter and ask the voter to confirm whether the
signature used for the mail ballot belongs to the voter.
4. For purposes of subsection 3:
(a) There is a reasonable question of fact as to whether the
signature used for the mail ballot matches the signature of the voter
if the signature used for the mail ballot differs in multiple,
significant and obvious respects from the signatures of the voter
available in the records of the clerk.
(b) There is not a reasonable question of fact as to whether the
signature used for the mail ballot matches the signature of the voter
if:
(1) The signature used for the mail ballot is a variation of the
signature of the voter caused by the substitution of initials for the
first or middle name, the substitution of a different type of
punctuation in the first, middle or last name, the use of a common
nickname or the use of one last name for a person who has two last
names and it does not otherwise differ in multiple, significant and
obvious respects from the signatures of the voter available in the
records of the clerk; or
(2) There are only slight dissimilarities between the signature
used for the mail ballot and the signatures of the voter available in
the records of the clerk.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, if the clerk
determines that the voter is entitled to cast the mail ballot, the clerk
shall deposit the mail ballot in the proper ballot box or place the
mail ballot, unopened, in a container that must be securely locked or
under the control of the clerk at all times. The clerk shall deliver the
-
*SB195*

– 8 –
mail ballots to the mail ballot central counting board to be processed
and prepared for counting.
6. If the clerk determines when checking the signature used for
the mail ballot that the voter failed to affix his or her signature or
failed to affix it in the manner required by law for the mail ballot or
that there is a reasonable question of fact as to whether the signature
used for the mail ballot matches the signature of the voter, but the
voter is otherwise entitled to cast the mail ballot, the clerk shall
contact the voter and advise the voter of the procedures to provide a
signature or a confirmation that the signature used for the mail ballot
belongs to the voter, as applicable. For the mail ballot to be counted,
the voter must provide a signature or a confirmation, as applicable,
not later than 5 p.m. on the [sixth] third day following the election.
7. The clerk shall prescribe procedures for a voter who failed to
affix his or her signature or failed to affix it in the manner required
by law for the mail ballot, or for whom there is a reasonable
question of fact as to whether the signature used for the mail ballot
matches the signature of the voter, in order to:
(a) Contact the voter;
(b) Allow the voter to provide a signature or a confirmation that
the signature used for the mail ballot belongs to the voter, as
applicable; and
(c) After a signature or a confirmation is provided, as applicable,
ensure the mail ballot is delivered to the mail ballot central counting
board.
8. If there is a reasonable question of fact as to whether the
signature used for the mail ballot matches the signature of the voter,
the voter must be identified by:
(a) Answering questions from the county clerk covering the
personal data which is reported on the application to register to vote;
(b) Providing the county clerk, orally or in writing, with other
personal data which verifies the identity of the voter; or
(c) Providing the county clerk with proof of identification as
described in NRS 293.277 other than the voter registration card
issued to the voter.
9. The procedures established pursuant to subsection 7 for
contacting a voter must require the clerk to contact the voter, as
soon as possible after receipt of the mail ballot, by:
(a) Mail;
(b) Telephone, if a telephone number for the voter is available in
the records of the clerk; and
(c) Electronic means, which may include, without limitation,
electronic mail, if the voter has provided the clerk with sufficient
information to contact the voter by such means.
-
*SB195*

– 9 –
Sec. 9. Chapter 293C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 10 and 11 of this act.
Sec. 10. 1. The Secretary of State and each city clerk shall
establish procedures to inform registered voters of the
requirements for voting by mail ballot, including, without
limitation:
(a) The deadline for returning a mail ballot by mail or
personal delivery; and
(b) The deadline and process for a registered voter to cure any
defect with the voter’s signature on the mail ballot pursuant to
NRS 293C.26327.
 The procedures established pursuant to this subsection must
not conflict with the provisions of this section and NRS 293C.263
to 293C.26337, inclusive, and section 11 of this act.
2. Each city clerk shall provide training to election board
officers and employees of the elections division of the city on the
requirements for processing and counting mail ballots, including,
without limitation, the process for allowing a registered voter to
cure any defect with the registered voter’s signature on the mail
ballot.
Sec. 11. 1. After each city election, the city clerk shall
submit a report to the Secretary of State regarding mail ballots
that includes, without limitation:
(a) The number of mail ballots that were sent to registered
voters;
(b) The number of mail ballots that were returned by
registered voters;
(c) The number of mail ballots that were returned to the city
clerk by mail or personal delivery;
(d) The number of mail ballots that were returned without the
signature of the registered voter or that contained a defect in the
signature;
(e) The number of registered voters who were contacted by the
city clerk to cure a missing or defective signature; and
(f) The total number of mail ballots that were counted in the
city election.
2. The Secretary of State shall compile the information
received pursuant to subsection 1 from each city clerk and submit
a summary to the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to the Legislature or, if the Legislature is not in
session, to the Legislative Commission.
Sec. 12. NRS 293C.26314 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.26314 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
if a person applied by mail or computer to register to vote, or
-
*SB195*

– 10 –
preregistered to vote by mail or computer and is subsequently
deemed to be registered to vote, and the person has not previously
voted in any election for federal office in this State, the city clerk
must inform the person that he or she must include a copy of the
information required in paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS
293.2725 in the return envelope with the mail ballot.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to a person who:
(a) Registers to vote by mail or computer, or preregisters to vote
by mail or computer and is subsequently deemed to be registered to
vote, and submits with his or her application to preregister or
register to vote:
(1) A copy of a current and valid photo identification; or
(2) A copy of a current utility bill, bank statement, paycheck
or document issued by a governmental entity, including a check
which indicates the name and address of the person, but not
including a voter registration card;
(b) Registers to vote by mail or computer and submits with his
or her application to register to vote a driver’s license number or at
least the last four digits of his or her social security number, if a
state or local election official has matched that information with an
existing identification record bearing the same number, name and
date of birth as provided by the person in the application;
(c) Registers to vote pursuant to NRS 293.5768 to 293.57699,
inclusive, and at that time presents to the automatic voter
registration agency:
(1) A copy of a current and valid photo identification;
(2) A copy of a current utility bill, bank statement, paycheck
or document issued by a governmental entity, including a check
which indicates the name and address of the person, but not
including a voter registration card; or
(3) A driver’s license number or at least the last four digits of
his or her social security number, if a state or local election official
has matched that information with an existing identification record
bearing the same number, name and date of birth as provided by the
person in the application;
(d) Is entitled to vote pursuant to the provisions of chapter 293D
of NRS or the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting
Act, 52 U.S.C. §§ 20301 et seq.;
(e) Is provided the right to vote otherwise than in person
pursuant to the provisions of the Voting Accessibility for the Elderly
and Handicapped Act, 52 U.S.C. §§ 20101 et seq.; or
(f) Is entitled to vote otherwise than in person pursuant to the
provisions of any other federal law.
-
*SB195*

– 11 –
3. If a person fails to provide the identification required
pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS 293.2725 with his
or her mail ballot:
(a) The mail ballot must be treated as a provisional ballot; and
(b) The city clerk must:
(1) Contact the person;
(2) Allow the person to provide the identification required
before 5 p.m. on the [sixth] third day following the election; and
(3) If the identification required pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subsection 1 of NRS 293.2725 is provided, ensure the mail ballot is
delivered to the appropriate mail ballot central counting board.
Sec. 13. NRS 293C.26321 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.26321 1. Except as otherwise provided in [subsection 2
and] chapter 293D of NRS, in order for a mail ballot to be counted
for any election, before the close of business of the office of the
city clerk on the day of the election, the mail ballot must be:
(a) [Before the time set for closing of the polls, delivered]
Delivered by hand to the city clerk [,] or any ballot drop box
established in the city [,] pursuant to this section; or
(b) [Mailed to] Received by mail by the city clerk . [, and:
(1) Postmarked on or before the day of the election; and
(2) Received by the clerk not later than 5 p.m. on the fourth
day following the election.]
2. [If a mail ballot is received by mail not later than 5 p.m. on
the third day following the election and the date of the postmark
cannot be determined, the mail ballot shall be deemed to have been
postmarked on or before the day of the election.
3.] Each city clerk must establish a ballot drop box at every
polling place in the city, including, without limitation, a polling
place for early voting. A city clerk may establish a drop box at any
other location in the city where mail ballots can be delivered by
hand and collected during the period for early voting and on election
day. No person other than a clerk may establish a drop box for mail
ballots.
[4.] 3. A ballot drop box must be:
(a) Constructed of metal or any other rigid material of sufficient
strength and resistance to protect the security of the mail ballots; and
(b) Capable of securely receiving and holding the mail ballots
and being locked.
[5.] 4. A ballot drop box must be:
(a) Placed in an accessible and convenient location at the office
of the city clerk, or a polling place in the city; and
(b) Made available for use during the hours when the office of
the city clerk, or the polling place, is open for business or voting, as
-
*SB195*

– 12 –
applicable [.] , except that on election day, the ballot drop box must
not be available after the close of business of the office of the city
clerk.
Sec. 14. NRS 293C.26323 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.26323 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
at the request of a voter whose mail ballot has been prepared by or
on behalf of the voter, a person authorized by the voter may return
the mail ballot on behalf of the voter by mail or personal delivery to
the city clerk, or any ballot drop box established in the city, pursuant
to NRS 293C.26321.
2. Except for an election board officer in the course of the
election board officer’s official duties, a person shall not willfully:
(a) Impede, obstruct, prevent or interfere with the return of a
voter’s mail ballot;
(b) Deny a voter the right to return the voter’s mail ballot; or
(c) If the person receives the voter’s mail ballot and
authorization to return the mail ballot on behalf of the voter by mail
or personal delivery, fail to return the mail ballot [, unless otherwise
authorized by the voter,] by mail or personal delivery [:
(1) Before the end of the third day after the day of receipt, if
the person receives the mail ballot from the voter four or more days
before the day of the election; or
(2) Before the deadline established by the United States
Postal Service for the mail ballot to be postmarked on the day of the
election or before the polls close on the day of the election, as
applicable to the type of delivery, if the person receives the mail
ballot from the voter three or fewer days before the day of the
election.] so that the mail ballot is received by the city clerk before
the close of business of the office of the city clerk on the day of the
election.
3. A person who violates any provision of subsection 2 is
guilty of a category E felony and shall be punished as provided in
NRS 193.130.
Sec. 15. NRS 293C.26325 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.26325 1. The city clerk shall establish procedures for
the fair and efficient processing and counting of mail ballots.
2. The procedures established pursuant to subsection 1:
(a) May authorize mail ballots to be processed, verified and
counted by computer or other electronic means; and
(b) Must not conflict with the provisions of NRS 293C.263 to
293C.26337, inclusive.
-
*SB195*

– 13 –
Sec. 16. NRS 293C.26327 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.26327 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS
293D.200, when a mail ballot is returned by or on behalf of a voter
to the city clerk, and a record of its return is made in the mail ballot
record for the election, the clerk or an employee in the office of the
clerk shall check the signature used for the mail ballot by electronic
means pursuant to subsection 2 or manually pursuant to
subsection 3.
2. To check the signature used for a mail ballot by electronic
means:
(a) The electronic device must take a digital image of the
signature used for the mail ballot and electronically compare the
digital image with the signatures of the voter from his or her
application to register to vote or application to preregister to vote
available in the records of the city clerk.
(b) If the electronic device does not match the signature of the
voter, the signature shall be reviewed manually pursuant to the
provisions of subsection 3.
3. To check the signature used for a mail ballot manually, the
city clerk shall use the following procedure:
(a) The clerk or employee shall check the signature used for the
mail ballot against all signatures of the voter available in the records
of the clerk.
(b) If at least two employees in the office of the clerk believe
there is a reasonable question of fact as to whether the signature
used for the mail ballot matches the signature of the voter, the clerk
shall contact the voter and ask the voter to confirm whether the
signature used for the mail ballot belongs to the voter.
4. For purposes of subsection 3:
(a) There is a reasonable question of fact as to whether the
signature used for the mail ballot matches the signature of the voter
if the signature used for the mail ballot differs in multiple,
significant and obvious respects from the signatures of the voter
available in the records of the clerk.
(b) There is not a reasonable question of fact as to whether the
signature used for the mail ballot matches the signature of the voter
if:
(1) The signature used for the mail ballot is a variation of the
signature of the voter caused by the substitution of initials for the
first or middle name, the substitution of a different type of
punctuation in the first, middle or last name, the use of a common
nickname or the use of one last name for a person who has two last
names and it does not otherwise differ in multiple, significant and
-
*SB195*

– 14 –
obvious respects from the signatures of the voter available in the
records of the clerk; or
(2) There are only slight dissimilarities between the signature
used for the mail ballot and the signatures of the voter available in
the records of the clerk.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, if the clerk
determines that the voter is entitled to cast the mail ballot, the clerk
shall deposit the mail ballot in the proper ballot box or place the
mail ballot, unopened, in a container that must be securely locked or
under the control of the clerk at all times. The clerk shall deliver the
mail ballots to the mail ballot central counting board to be processed
and prepared for counting.
6. If the clerk determines when checking the signature used for
the mail ballot that the voter failed to affix his or her signature or
failed to affix it in the manner required by law for the mail ballot or
that there is a reasonable question of fact as to whether the signature
used for the mail ballot matches the signature of the voter, but the
voter is otherwise entitled to cast the mail ballot, the clerk shall
contact the voter and advise the voter of the procedures to provide a
signature or a confirmation that the signature used for the mail ballot
belongs to the voter, as applicable. For the mail ballot to be counted,
the voter must provide a signature or a confirmation, as applicable,
not later than 5 p.m. on the [sixth] third day following the election.
7. The clerk shall prescribe procedures for a voter who failed to
affix his or her signature or failed to affix it in the manner required
by law for the mail ballot, or for whom there is a reasonable
question of fact as to whether the signature used for the mail ballot
matches the signature of the voter, in order to:
(a) Contact the voter;
(b) Allow the voter to provide a signature or a confirmation that
the signature used for the mail ballot belongs to the voter, as
applicable; and
(c) After a signature or a confirmation is provided, as applicable,
ensure the mail ballot is delivered to the mail ballot central counting
board.
8. If there is a reasonable question of fact as to whether the
signature used for the mail ballot matches the signature of the voter,
the voter must be identified by:
(a) Answering questions from the city clerk covering the
personal data which is reported on the application to register to vote;
(b) Providing the city clerk, orally or in writing, with other
personal data which verifies the identity of the voter; or
(c) Providing the city clerk with proof of identification as
described in NRS 293C.270 other than the voter registration card
issued to the voter.
-
*SB195*

– 15 –
9. The procedures established pursuant to subsection 7 for
contacting a voter must require the clerk to contact the voter, as
soon as possible after receipt of the mail ballot, by:
(a) Mail;
(b) Telephone, if a telephone number for the voter is available in
the records of the clerk; and
(c) Electronic means, which may include, without limitation,
electronic mail, if the voter has provided the clerk with sufficient
information to contact the voter by such means.
Sec. 17. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 18. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 19. 1. This section and sections 17 and 18 of this act
become effective upon passage and approval.
2. Sections 1 to 16, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB195*